Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-12,142
Report; contents.

The
department shall prepare and present electronically a report to the Legislature
by December 1, 2014, on the Small Business
Innovation Act that includes, but is not limited to, businesses assisted,
aggregate change in sales revenue, number of jobs created, and range of newly
created jobs that includes an average wage.

Laws 2011, LB345, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 194;

Laws 2013, LB628, § 2.
December 31, 2014